old_to_new_polish.sbl
routines (
   Step_1a Step_1b
   exceptions
   prefixes
)

externals ( stem )

define exceptions as (
    [substring] among(
        'módz'    (<-'móc')
        'biedz'   (<-'biec')
        'bydź'    (<-'być')
        'maryj'   (<-'Mari')
        'marj'    (<-'Mari')
        'francuz' (<-'francus')
        'ked'     (<-'kied')
        'kel'     (<-'kiel')
        'kaźń'    (<-'kaźń')
    )
)

define prefixes as (
    [substring] among(
        'gieo'    (<-'geo')
        'kie'     (<-'ke')
        'dya'     (<-'dia')
        'jener'   (<-'gener')
        'kaź'     (<-'każ')
        'mai'     (<-'maj')
    )
)



backwardmode (

    define Step_1a as (
        [substring] among (

            'ya'     (<-'ia')
            'ye'     (<-'ie')
            'yi'     (<-'ii')
            'yą'     (<-'ią')
            'yę'     (<-'ię')
            'yji'    (<-'iji')
            'yią'    (<-'ią')
            'yj'     (<-'ej')
            'yum'    (<-'ium')
            'yów'    (<-'iów')


            'cya'    (<-'cja')
            'cye'    (<-'cje')
            'cyi'    (<-'cji')
            'cyj'    (<-'cej')
            'cyą'    (<-'cją')
            'cyę'    (<-'cję')
            'cyji'   (<-'cji')
            'cyią'   (<-'cją')


            'zya'    (<-'zja')
            'zye'    (<-'zje')
            'zyi'    (<-'zji')
            'zyj'    (<-'zej')
            'zyą'    (<-'zją')
            'zyę'    (<-'zję')
            'zyji'   (<-'zji')
            'zyią'   (<-'zją')
            'zcyj'   (<-'zcji')


            'sya'    (<-'sja')
            'sye'    (<-'sje')
            'syj'    (<-'sej')
            'syą'    (<-'sją')
            'syę'    (<-'sję')
            'syji'   (<-'sji')
            'syi'    (<-'sji')
            'syią'   (<-'sją')
            'scyj'   (<-'scji')


            'yotyzm' (<-'iotyzm')
            'yotami' (<-'iotami')
            'yjotka' (<-'iotka')
            'yjota'  (<-'iota')
            'yjami'  (<-'jami')
            'yencyi' (<-'iencji')
            'yszem'  (<-'jszym')


            'em'     (<-'ym')
            'emi'    (<-'ymi')
            'iem'    (<-'im')
            'nij'    (<-'ni')
            'dszy'   (<-'dłszy')
            'lyi'    (<-'li')
        )
    )

    define Step_1b as (
        [substring] among (
            'łym'    (<-'łem')
            'rym'    (<-'rem')
            'iymi'   (<-'imi')
            'iym'    (<-'im')
            'ąci'    (<-'ący') 
            'otym'   (<-'otem')
            'okim'   (<-'okiem')
            'ktym'   (<-'ktem')
            'órem'   (<-'órym')
            'óremi'  (<-'órymi')
            'alem'   (<-'alym')
            'ńcym'   (<-'ńcem')
            'azym'   (<-'azem')
            'odym'   (<-'odem')
            'brem'   (<-'brym')
            'ptym'   (<-'ptem')
            'arzym'  (<-'arzem')
            'trzym'  (<-'trzem')
            'ewym'   (<-'ewem')
            'ędym'   (<-'ędem')
            'alym'   (<-'alem')
            'ołym'   (<-'ołem')
            'atym'   (<-'atem')
            'stem'   (<-'stym')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prefixes

    backwards (
        do Step_1a
    )
     backwards (
        do Step_1b
     )
    do exceptions
)
